Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 18
SHERIFF’S REVOLVING EXPENSE FUND

Sec.

§ 31-1801. Drawing expenses in advance.

In each instance where the duties of the sheriff of any county require him, in his official capacity, to incur traveling and hotel expenses, training, or any duty requiring the need of a warrant, for himself or his deputies, he may, prior to the incurring thereof, make demand on the county auditor for a warrant on the county treasurer and shall receive a sum not to exceed the amount set aside under the provisions of section 31-1802, Idaho Code, to be used for the purpose of defraying the whole or a part of said traveling and hotel expenses, training, or any duty requiring the need of a warrant. At the time demand is made on the county auditor for said warrant it shall be the duty of the sheriff to file with the auditor a statement specifying the general purpose for which the sum to be withdrawn is to be used.

§ 31-1802. Sheriff’s revolving expense fund.

There shall be set aside by the board of county commissioners of each county upon the request of the sheriff thereof by order entered in their minutes a sum not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), to be known as the “Sheriff’s Revolving Expense Fund,” in this chapter referred to as the fund, out of which fund any warrants drawn under the provision of this chapter shall be paid. The amount set aside for such fund shall be charged by the auditor against the sheriff and the board of county commissioners may require of the sheriff, a bond, in addition to his official bond, in such sum as the board may determine, to secure the repayment of such sum or sums withdrawn. The fund so set aside shall remain in the county treasury subject to withdrawal and reimbursement as herein provided.

§ 31-1803. Audit and allowance of fund — Repayment of disallowed amount.

After the performance of the duty, which necessitated the incurring of traveling and hotel expenses, training, or any duty requiring the need of a warrant, and the withdrawal of money has been made, as in this chapter provided, the board of county commissioners may require the sheriff to present his itemized claim for such traveling and hotel expenses, training, or any duty requiring the need of a warrant, as other claims are presented to the board of county commissioners, which body shall audit said claims for allowance or rejection. For those items allowed it shall be the duty of the board of county commissioners to order a warrant drawn, payable to the county treasurer for the total amount of the items allowed, which warrant shall be delivered to the county auditor. If any item of said claim is disallowed, the sheriff shall deposit with the county auditor an amount equal to the amount disallowed, together with any unexpended portion of the amounts withdrawn, which amounts, together with the warrant drawn in favor of the county treasurer for the amount of items allowed, shall be credited by the county auditor to the sheriff and shall be deposited by the auditor in the county treasury and placed to the credit of the fund.

§ 31-1804. Penalty for failure to make repayment.

Any sheriff failing to make repayment, as herein provided, to the said fund, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.